apertium-en-af/apertium-en-af.af.dix
    <pardef n="taamlik__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- Adjektiven -->

    <pardef n="noordelik__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="swart__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="voka/al__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>al</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>al<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vokati/ef__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ef</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ewe</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ou__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>dste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jon/g__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>k</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ger</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>gste</l>
	  <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="nu/ut__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ut</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>wer</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>utste</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/goed__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>goed</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>goeie</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>beter</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>beste</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maklik__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Nomen -->

    <pardef n="poësie__n__unc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bo/om__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="appèl__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
       <l>le</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bier__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ta/al__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
	  <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="artikel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="na/am__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
	  <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vla/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vra/ag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lys__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 


    <pardef n="resulta/at__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
	  <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoofst/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abakus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ongeluk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afspra/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="da/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="voorde/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
	  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="avontu/ur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sa/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ouderdom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lughawe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="taamlik"><i>taamlik</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meer"><i>meer</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meeste"><i>meeste</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="baie"><i>baie</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="stad"><i>st</i><par n="hoofst/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mens"><i>mens</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huis"><i>huis</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voorbeeld"><i>voorbeeld</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woordelys"><i>woordelys</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="projek"><i>projek</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakket"><i>pakket</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kletskamer"><i>kletskamer</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ontdekking"><i>ontdekking</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taal"><i>ta</i><par n="ta/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metaal"><i>meta</i><par n="ta/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="resultaat"><i>resulta</i><par n="resulta/at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaat"><i>pla</i><par n="resulta/at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naam"><i>na</i><par n="na/am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vlag"><i>vla</i><par n="vla/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vraag"><i>vra</i><par n="vra/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoofstad"><i>hoofst</i><par n="hoofst/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sensus"><i>parlement</i><par n="abakus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefoonkode"><i>telefoonkode</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="groep"><i>groep</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lewe"><i>lewe</i><par n="lughawe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uitspraak"><i>uitspra</i><par n="afspra/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="appèl"><i>appèl</i><par n="appèl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tabel"><i>tabel</i><par n="appèl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boom"><i>bo</i><par n="bo/om__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poësie"><i>poësie</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="volkskunde"><i>volkskunde</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="outomaties"><i>outomaties</i><par n="noordelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="groen"><i>groen</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rood"><i>rood</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geel"><i>geel</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bruin"><i>bruin</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nuut"><i>nu</i><par n="nu/ut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="goed"><i/><par n="/goed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ou"><i>ou</i><par n="ou__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jong"><i>jon</i><par n="jon/g__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="groot"><i>groot</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="duidelik"><i>duidelik</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kort"><i>kort</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lang"><i>lang</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vokaal"><i>voka</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="instrumentaal"><i>instrumenta</i><par n="voka/al__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ablatief"><i>ablati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="komparatief"><i>komparati</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="partitief"><i>partiti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="transitief"><i>transiti</i><par n="vokati/ef__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Fins"><i>Fins</i><par n="noordelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Maleis"><i>Maleis</i><par n="noordelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Oesbekies"><i>Oesbekies</i><par n="noordelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Surinaams"><i>Surinaams</i><par n="noordelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abakus"><i>abakus</i><par n="abakus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ongeluk"><i>ongeluk</i><par n="ongeluk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afspraak"><i>afspra</i><par n="afspra/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akroniem"><i>akroniem</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daad"><i>da</i><par n="da/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adres"><i>adres</i><par n="abakus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadeel"><i>nade</i><par n="voorde/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voordeel"><i>voorde</i><par n="voorde/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deel"><i>de</i><par n="voorde/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avontuur"><i>avontu</i><par n="avontu/ur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saak"><i>sa</i><par n="sa/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ouderdom"><i>ouderdom</i><par n="ouderdom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stam"><i>stam</i><par n="ouderdom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lughawe"><i>lughawe</i><par n="lughawe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alfabet"><i>alfabet</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dag"><i>da</i><par n="vla/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="datum"><i>datum</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
